Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.130

Committee. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Committee[,]" unless the context indicates otherwise, includes a political committee such as a candidate, ballot proposition, recall, political, or continuing political committee.

[ 2024 c 164 s 213.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.